th: อาหาร เครื่องดื่ม และยาสูบ > รายการอาหาร > ส่วนผสมในการทำอาหารและการอบ > ต้นเชื้อจุลินทรีย์: หัวเชื้อทำชีส; หัวเชื้อคีเฟอร์; หัวเชื้อคอมบูชาและจุน; หัวเชื้อซาวร์โด; หัวเชื้อทำโยเกิร์ต
vi: Thực phẩm, đồ uống và thuốc lá > Hàng thực phẩm > Nguyên liệu nấu ăn và nướng bánh > Men cái: Men cái phô mai; Men cái nấm sữa kefir; Men cái kombucha & jun; Men cái sourdough; Men cái sữa chua
it: Cibo, bevande e tabacco > Alimenti > Ingredienti per cucinare e da forno > Fermenti: Fermenti per formaggio; Fermenti per kefir; Colture per kombucha e jun; Lievito madre; Fermenti per yogurt
sl-SI: Hrana, pijača in tobak > Prehrambeni izdelki > Sestavine za kuhanje in peko > Kvasne kulture: Starter kulture za sir; Mikrobne kulture za nastavek za kefir; Mikrobne kulture za kombučo in jun; Nastavek za kisano testo; Starter kulture za jogurt
nl: Eten, drinken en tabak > Voedselitems > Ingrediënten voor koken en bakken > Startculturen: Kaasstartculturen; Kefirstartculturen; Kombucha- en junculturen; Zuurdesemstarters; Yoghurtstartculturen
en: Food, Beverages & Tobacco > Food Items > Cooking & Baking Ingredients > Starter Cultures: Cheese Starter Cultures; Kefir Starter Cultures; Kombucha & Jun Cultures; Sourdough Starters; Yogurt Starter Cultures
pl: Żywność, napoje i tytoń > Żywność > Składniki do gotowania i pieczenia > Kultury starterowe: Kultury bakterii serowarskich; Kultury bakterii do kefiru; Kultury startowe do kombuchy i jun; Zakwasy chlebowe; Kultury bakterii jogurtowych
lt-LT: Maistas, gėrimai ir tabakas > Maisto prekės > Maisto gaminimo ir kepimo ingredientai > Bakterijų kultūros: Sūrio raugo kultūros; Kefyro raugo kultūros; Kombučios ir Jun kultūros; Raugintos duonos raugas; Jogurto raugo kultūros
zh-CN: 饮食/烟酒 > 食品 > 烹饪与烘焙原料/作料 > 发酵剂: 奶酪发酵菌种; 开菲尔发酵菌种; 康普茶和绿茶菌种; 酸面团发酵种; 酸奶发酵菌种
fr: Alimentation, boissons et tabac > Aliments > Ingrédients pour la cuisine et la pâtisserie > Ferments: Ferments pour fromage; Ferments pour kéfir; Souches de kombucha et jun; Levains; Ferments pour yaourt
bg-BG: Храна, напитки и тютюневи изделия > Хранителни продукти > Съставки за готвене и печене > Стартерни култури: Стартови култури за сирене; Закваски за кефир; Култури за комбуча и джун; Закваски; Стартови култури за кисело мляко
sv: Mat, dryck och tobak > Livsmedel > Ingredienser för matlagning och bakning > Syraväckare: Mjölksyrakulturer för ost; Startkulturer för kefir; Kombucha- & junkulturer; Surdegsgrunder; Startkulturer för yoghurt
fi: Ruoka, juoma ja tupakkatuotteet > Ruokatuotteet > Ruuanlaitto- ja leivonta-aineet > Hapatteet: Juustohapatteet; Kefiirihapatteet; Kombucha- ja jun-hapatteet; Hapanjuuret; Jogurttihapatteet
ja: 食品・飲料 > 食品 > 調理材料・製菓材料 > スターター培養菌: チーズ用種菌; ケフィア種菌; コンブチャ・ジュン種菌; サワードウスターター; ヨーグルト種菌
tr: Yiyecek, İçecekler ve Tütün Mamülleri > Yiyecek Çeşitleri > Pişirme Malzemeleri > Starter Kültürler: Peynir başlangıç kültürleri; Kefir başlangıç kültürleri; Kombu çayı ve jun kültürleri; Ekşi maya kültürleri; Yoğurt başlangıç kültürleri
sk-SK: Potraviny, nápoje a tabakové výrobky > Potraviny > Prísady na varenie a pečenie > Štartovacie kultúry: Štartovacie kultúry na výrobu syra; Kefírové kultúry; Kultúry na kombuchu a jun; Kvásky; Jogurtové kultúry
el: Τρόφιμα, ποτά & προϊόντα καπνού > Είδη διατροφής > Υλικά μαγειρικής & ζαχαροπλαστικής > Καλλιέργειες μαγιάς: Καλλιέργειες εκκίνησης τυριού; Καλλιέργειες εκκίνησης κεφίρ; Καλλιέργειες κομπούτσας και jun; Προζύμια; Καλλιέργειες εκκίνησης γιαουρτιού
zh-TW: 食物、飲料和菸草 > 食品 > 烹飪和烘焙食材 > 發酵: 起司發酵菌種; 克菲爾發酵菌種; 康普茶與菌茶菌種; 酸種酵母; 優格發酵菌種
ru: Продукты, напитки и табачные изделия > Пищевые продукты > Кулинарные и кондитерские ингредиенты > Заквасочные культуры: Закваски для сыра; Закваски для кефира; Культуры для комбучи и джуна; Закваски для теста; Закваски для йогурта
da: Fødevarer, drikkevarer og tobak > Fødevarer > Ingredienser til madlavning og bagning > Starterkulturer: Starterkulturer til ost; Starterkulturer til kefir; Kombucha- og jun-kulturer; Surdejsstartere; Starterkulturer til yoghurt
es: Alimentación, bebida y tabaco > Alimentos > Ingredientes de cocina y repostería > Levaduras: Cultivos iniciadores para queso; Cultivos iniciadores para kéfir; Cultivos de kombucha y jun; Masa madre; Cultivos iniciadores para yogur
de: Nahrungsmittel, Getränke & Tabak > Lebensmittel > Koch- & Backzutaten > Starterkulturen: Käse-Starterkulturen; Kefir-Starterkulturen; Kombucha- & Jun-Kulturen; Sauerteig-Starterkulturen; Joghurt-Starterkulturen
nb: Mat, drikkevarer og tobakk > Matvarer > Ingredienser til matlagning og baking > Startkulturer: Startkulturer for ost; Startkulturer for kefir; Kulturer for kombucha og jun; Surdeigsstartere; Startkulturer for yoghurt
ro-RO: Alimente, băuturi și tutun > Produse alimentare > Ingrediente pentru gătit și copt > Culturi starter: Culturi starter pentru brânză; Culturi starter pentru chefir; Culturi pentru kombucha și jun; Starter pentru pâine cu maia; Culturi starter pentru iaurt
cs: Jídlo, pití a tabák > Potraviny > Ingredience na vaření a pečení > Startovací kultury: Sýrařské kultury; Kefírové kultury; Kultury pro kombuchu a jun; Kvásky; Jogurtové kultury
hr-HR: Hrana, piće i duhan > Prehrambeni artikli > Sastojci za kuhanje i pečenje kolača > Starter kulture: Starter kulture za sir; Starter kulture za kefir; Kulture za kombuchu i jun; Starter za kiselo tijesto; Starter kulture za jogurt
pt-BR: Alimentos, bebidas e tabaco > Alimentos > Ingredientes para cozidos e assados > Culturas de fermentação: Culturas lácteas para queijo; Culturas para kefir; Culturas para kombucha e jun; Fermento natural (Sourdough); Culturas lácteas para iogurte
hu: Élelmiszerek, italok és dohányáru > Élelmiszertételek > Főzési és sütési összetevők > Indítókultúrák: Sajtkultúrák; Kefirkultúrák; Kombucha- és junkultúrák; Kovászok; Joghurtkultúrák
pt-PT: Comida, bebidas e tabaco > Artigos alimentares > Ingredientes para cozinhar e assar > Culturas-mãe de fermentação: Culturas de arranque para queijo; Culturas de arranque para kefir; Culturas de kombucha e jun; Isco de massa-mãe; Culturas de arranque para iogurte
ko: 식품/음료/담배 > 식품 > 요리 및 제과/제빵 재료 > 종균 배양: 치즈 종균; 케피어 종균; 콤부차 및 준 종균; 사워도우 스타터; 요거트 종균